Arkansas, session 2025, HB1827.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 15-41-303 is amended to read as follows:
15-41-303. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Commission” means the Arkansas State Game and Fish
Commission;
(2) "Commission-leased lands" means those lands over which the
commission holds a possessory interest under lease or other written agreement
that has a term of at least one (1) year and includes public recreational
hunting rights;
(3) “Commission-managed lands” means those lands that are either
commission-owned lands or commission-leased lands:
(A) That the commission owns; and
(B) Over which the commission holds management authority;
and
(4) "Commission-owned lands" means those lands to which the
commission holds title in fee simple; and
(3)(5) “Hunting” means the lawful pursuit, trapping, shooting,
capture, collection, or killing of wildlife or the attempt to pursue, trap,
*CRH216*
04-07-2025 11:18:44 CRH216

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 HB1827
shoot, capture, collect, or kill wildlife.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 15-41-304 is amended to read as follows:
15-41-304. Recreational hunting.
(a) Subject to valid existing rights, commission-managed lands shall
be open to access and use for recreational hunting except as limited by the
Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission for reasons of public safety or
homeland security or as otherwise limited by law fish or wildlife management
or as otherwise limited by statutory authority of the commission.
(b)(1) The commission shall exercise its authority consistent with
subsection (a) of this section in a manner to support, promote, and enhance
recreational hunting opportunities to the extent authorized by law.
(2) The commission is not required to give preference to hunting
over other uses of commission-managed lands or over land or water management
priorities established by state law.
(c)(1) To the greatest practicable extent, commission land management
decisions and actions, including decisions made by private owners to close
commission-managed lands, may shall not result in any net loss of habitat
land acreage available for hunting opportunities on commission-managed lands
that exists on August 12, 2005 January 1, 2025.
(2) This subchapter does not apply to commission-owned lands
under contract to private persons or entities.
(3) Acreage lost from commission-leased lands due to the
expiration or termination of the lease or agreement on the commission-leased
lands shall not be counted in the net loss calculation.
(d)(1) The commission shall expeditiously find replacement acreage for
hunting to compensate for the closures of any existing hunting land.
(2) To the greatest extent possible, the replacement land
required under subdivision (d)(1) of this section shall be:
(A) Located within a reasonable distance from the closed
land; and
(B) Consistent with the hunting discipline that the
commission allowed on the closed land.
(d)(e) On or before October 1 July 1 of each year, the commission
shall submit to the House and Senate cochairs of the Legislative Council
House Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs and the Senate
04-07-2025 11:18:44 CRH216

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 HB1827
Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs a written report
describing:
(1) The acreage administered by the commission number of acres
of commission-managed lands that has been were closed during the previous
fiscal year to recreational hunting and the reasons for the closures; and
(2) The acreage administered by the commission number of acres
of commission-managed lands that was opened were open to recreational hunting
to compensate for the acreage that was closed during the previous fiscal
year.
(e)(f) This subchapter does not compel the opening to recreational
hunting of national parks or national monuments administered by the National
Park Service.
(g) This subchapter does not prohibit a private landowner from making
otherwise legal decisions regarding access to his or her privately owned
commission-managed lands.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. Report.
The initial report required under Section 2 of this act shall be
submitted by July 1, 2025.

/s/Wardlaw















04-07-2025 11:18:44 CRH216